Illinois, session 104th, SB1883.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 3-413 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/3-413)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-413)7    Sec. 3-413. Display of registration plates or digital 8registration plates, registration stickers or digital 9registration stickers, and drive-away permits; registration 10plate or digital registration plate covers.11    (a) Registration plates or digital registration plates 12issued for a motor vehicle other than a motorcycle, autocycle, 13trailer, semitrailer, truck-tractor, apportioned bus, or 14apportioned truck shall be attached thereto, one in the 15frontmost and one in the rearmost. The registration plate or 16digital registration plate issued for a motorcycle, autocycle, 17trailer or semitrailer required to be registered hereunder and 18any apportionment plate issued to a bus under the provisions 19of this Code shall be attached to the rearmost thereof. The 20registration plate or digital registration plate issued for a 21truck-tractor or an apportioned truck required to be 22registered hereunder shall be attached to the frontmost 23thereof.  SB1883 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10476 LNS 20551 b1    (b) Except for vehicles with rear loaded motorized 2forklifts, every registration plate or digital registration 3plate shall at all times be securely fastened in a horizontal 4position to the vehicle for which it is issued so as to prevent 5the plate from swinging and at a height of not less than 5 6inches from the ground, measuring from the bottom of such 7plate, in a place and position to be clearly visible and shall 8be maintained in a condition to be clearly legible, free from 9any materials that would obstruct the visibility of the plate. 10A registration plate or digital registration plate on a 11motorcycle may be mounted vertically as long as it is 12otherwise clearly visible. Registration stickers or digital 13registration stickers issued as evidence of renewed annual 14registration shall be attached to registration plates or 15displayed on digital registration plates as required by the 16Secretary of State, and be clearly visible at all times and 17displayed as prescribed in subsection (k). For those vehicles 18with rear loaded motorized forklifts, if the rear plate is 19securely fastened in a horizontal position as prescribed, the 20plate and registration sticker shall not be required to be 21clearly visible at all times as a result of the rear mounted 22motorized forklift obstructing the view. 23    (c) Every drive-away permit issued pursuant to this Code 24shall be firmly attached to the motor vehicle in the manner 25prescribed by the Secretary of State. If a drive-away permit 26is affixed to a motor vehicle in any other manner the permit   SB1883 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 10476 LNS 20551 b1shall be void and of no effect.2    (d) The Illinois prorate decal issued to a foreign 3registered vehicle part of a fleet prorated or apportioned 4with Illinois, shall be displayed on a registration plate or 5digital registration plate and displayed on the frontmost of 6such vehicle in the same manner as an Illinois registration 7plate or digital registration plate.8    (e) The registration plate or digital registration plate 9issued for a camper body mounted on a truck displaying 10registration plates or digital registration plates shall be 11attached to the rearmost of the camper body.12    (f) No person shall operate a vehicle, nor permit the 13operation of a vehicle, upon which is displayed an Illinois 14registration plate or plates or digital registration plate or 15plates or registration stickers or digital registration 16stickers, except as provided for in subsection (b) of Section 173-701 of this Code, after the termination of the registration 18period for which issued or after the expiration date set 19pursuant to Sections 3-414 and 3-414.1 of this Code.20    (g) A person may not operate any motor vehicle that is 21equipped with registration plate or digital registration plate 22covers. A violation of this subsection (g) or a similar 23provision of a local ordinance is an offense against laws and 24ordinances regulating the movement of traffic.25    (h) A person may not sell or offer for sale a registration 26plate or digital registration plate cover. A violation of this   SB1883 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 10476 LNS 20551 b1subsection (h) is a business offense.2    (i) A person may not advertise for the purpose of 3promoting the sale of registration plate or digital 4registration plate covers. A violation of this subsection (i) 5is a business offense.6    (j) A person may not modify the original manufacturer's 7mounting location of the rear registration plate or digital 8registration plate on any vehicle so as to conceal the 9registration or to knowingly cause it to be obstructed in an 10effort to hinder a peace officer from obtaining the 11registration for the enforcement of a violation of this Code, 12Section 27.1 of the Toll Highway Act concerning toll evasion, 13or any municipal ordinance. Modifications prohibited by this 14subsection (j) include but are not limited to the use of an 15electronic device. A violation of this subsection (j) is a 16Class A misdemeanor.17    (k) Registration stickers issued as evidence of renewed 18registration by the Secretary shall be displayed on the upper 19right corner of the rear registration plate or in a manner 20otherwise provided by the Secretary. However, registration 21stickers issued to truck-tractors shall be displayed on the 22upper right corner of the front registration plate or in a 23manner otherwise provided by the Secretary.24    (l) No person shall affix to any registration plate, 25temporary registration plate, digital registration plate, 26registration sticker, or other evidence of registration issued   SB1883 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 10476 LNS 20551 b1by the Secretary any medallion, insignia, sticker, tape, or 2other object not issued or approved by the Secretary. No 3person shall alter, manipulate, apply, or otherwise manipulate 4any evidence of registration issued by the Secretary in any 5manner from the original condition as was received when issued 6by the Secretary. It is unlawful to operate any vehicle that 7(i) displays evidence of registration altered in any manner or 8displaying any medallion, insignia, sticker, tape, or other 9object as prescribed in this subsection or (ii) is equipped 10with a manual, electronic, or mechanical device that hides or 11obscures a registration plate. 12(Source: P.A. 103-706, eff. 1-1-25.)